North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-59 Music Therapists

43-59-01.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the state board of integrative health care created under chapter 43-57.

“Licensee” means an individual licensed by the board under this chapter.

“Music therapist” is an individual who practices music therapy.

“Music therapy” is the specialized use of music and the materials of music to restore, maintain, and improve the following areas of functioning: cognitive, psychological, social or emotional, affective, physical, sensory or sensorimotor, motor, communicative, and physiological functioning. Techniques used in the practice of music therapy include the use of music to provide participatory individual and group experiences; musical improvisation; therapeutic development of verbal skills and nonverbal behavior; receptive music learning; lyric discussions; memory recall; music and imagery; self-expression through composition and songwriting; socialization and enhancement of self-esteem through music performance; relaxation to music, including stress and pain management; learning through music; cultural and spiritual expression; development of fine and gross motor skills through responses to rhythm; respiratory and speech improvements through sound production; sensory integration and stimulation; increased awareness of music for development of recreation and leisure interests; and interactive verbal techniques to help facilitate, elicit, or summarize the techniques listed in this subsection and build the therapeutic relationship.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 331, § 5.

43-59-02.
Music therapy — License required — Title restrictions — Exceptions.

Effective August 1, 2012, a person may not hold out as practicing music therapy, hold out as being a music therapist, or use a title or other designation indicating the person is a music therapist in this state unless that person is an individual licensed under this chapter and chapter 43-57.

The licensure provisions of this chapter do not prevent or restrict the practice, services, or activities of any individual licensed in another profession or any individual supervised by a licensed professional from performing work incidental to the practice of that profession or occupation, if that individual does not represent the individual as a music therapist.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 331, § 5.

43-59-03.
Qualifications for licensure.

In order to obtain a license to practice music therapy in this state, an application must be made to the board. The application must be upon the form adopted by the board and must be made in the manner prescribed by the board.

An applicant for licensure to practice music therapy shall file an application on forms provided by the board showing to the board’s satisfaction that the applicant is an individual of good moral character, is at least eighteen years of age, and satisfied all the requirements established by the board which may include:

Successful graduation of a board-approved educational program;

Successful completion of a board-approved examination prescribed or endorsed by the board;

Hold in good standing a board-approved designation, such as:

A music therapist board-certified credential from the certification board for music therapists; or

A professional designation from the national music therapy registry, which may include registered music therapist, certified music therapist, and advanced certified music therapist.

Physical, mental, and professional capability for the practice of music therapy in a manner acceptable to the board;

A history free of any finding by the board, any other state licensure board, or any court of competent jurisdiction of the commission of any act that would constitute grounds for disciplinary action under this chapter or chapter 43-57. The board may modify this restriction for cause.

The application must be accompanied by the board-established license fees and application fees and by the documents, affidavits, and certificates necessary to establish that the applicant possesses the necessary qualifications.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 331, § 5.